Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-307
Conciliation, defined.

Conciliation shall mean the attempted resolution of issues raised by a complaint or by the investigation of a complaint through informal negotiations involving the aggrieved person, the respondent, and the commission.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 8.